Georgia, session 2025_26, HB13.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
The chairperson and members of the board of education of Echols County shall receive a per
diem of $500.000 for each day of attendance at regular meetings of the board and $50.00 for
each day of attendance at called meetings of the board, including training sessions of the
board. The total compensation for the chairperson and members of the board shall not
exceed $600.00 for any calendar month.
SECTION 2.
This Act shall become effective on the first day of the month following the month in which
it is approved by the Governor or in which it becomes law without such approval.
SECTION 3.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 13
- 1 -